Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1225
Mental health board hearings; closed to public; exception; where conducted.

All mental health board hearings under the Sex Offender Commitment Act shall be closed to the public except at the request of the subject and shall be held in a courtroom or at any convenient and suitable place designated by the mental health board. The board shall have the right to conduct the proceeding where the subject is currently residing if the subject is unable to travel.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 81.